Tennessee, session 114, HB0392.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-1-228, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
( ) A school that serves students in any of the grades nine through twelve (9-12)
with at least twenty (20) students in the current school year's graduating cohort must be
identified as a high school for purposes of assigning a letter grade pursuant to this
section.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0392
001066
- 1 -